Hawaii, session 2025, HB1088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-1603, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The following shall be exempt from this section: (1)  Any form of housing permanently excluding school-aged children, with the necessary covenants or declarations of restrictions recorded on the property; (2)  Any form of housing that is or will be paying the transient accommodations tax under chapter 237D; (3)  All nonresidential development; (4)  Any development with an executed education contribution agreement or other like document with the authority or the department for the contribution of school sites or payment of fees for school land or school construction; [and] [[](5)[]]    Any form of development by the Hawaii community development authority pursuant to part XII of chapter 206E[.]; and (6)  Any form of housing developed by the department of Hawaiian home lands for use by beneficiaries of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.